Utah statutes.
38-11-201.   Residence Lien Recovery Fund.
(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund called the "Residence
Lien Recovery Fund."
(2) (a)  The fund consists of all amounts collected by the division in
accordance with Section 38-11-202.
(b) (i)  The division shall deposit the funds in an account with the state
treasurer.
(ii)  The division shall record the funds in the Residence Lien Recovery Fund.
(c)  The fund shall earn interest.
(3)  The division shall employ personnel and resources necessary to administer
the fund and shall use fund money in accordance with Sections 38-11-203 and
38-11-204 and to pay the costs charged to the fund by the attorney general.
(4)  Costs incurred by the division for administering the fund shall be paid
out of fund money.
(5)  The Division of Finance shall report annually to the Legislature, the
division, and the board.  The report shall state:
(a)  amounts received by the fund;
(b)  disbursements from the fund;
(c)  interest earned and credited to the fund; and
(d)  the fund balance.
(6) (a)  For purposes of establishing and assessing fees under Section
63J-1-504, the provisions of this chapter are considered a new program for
fiscal year 1995-96.
(b)  The department shall submit its fee schedule to the Legislature for its
approval at the 1996 Annual General Session.
